Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.050

Office of financial management created—Transfer of powers, duties, and functions.

There is created in the office of the governor, the office of financial management which shall be composed of the present central budget agency and the state planning, program management, and population and research divisions of the present *planning and community affairs agency. Any powers, duties and functions assigned to the central budget agency, or any state planning, program management, or population and research functions assigned to the present *planning and community affairs agency by the 1969 legislature, shall be transferred to the office of financial management.

[ 1979 c 151 s 111; 1969 ex.s. c 239 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "planning and community affairs agency" has been renamed the "department of community, trade, and economic development." The "department of community, trade, and economic development" was renamed the "department of commerce" by 2009 c 565.